Illinois, session 104th, HB5805.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Truth in Toll 5Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. The Toll Highway Act is amended by changing 7Section 19 as follows: 8    (605 ILCS 10/19)  (from Ch. 121, par. 100-19)9    Sec. 19. Toll rates. The Authority shall fix and revise 10from time to time, tolls or charges or rates for the privilege 11of using each of the toll highways constructed pursuant to 12this Act. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted at rates 13calculated to provide the lowest reasonable toll rates that 14will provide funds sufficient with other revenues of the 15Authority to pay, (a) the cost of the construction of a toll 16highway authorized by joint resolution of the General Assembly 17pursuant to Section 14.1 and the reconstruction, major repairs 18or improvements of toll highways, (b) the cost of maintaining, 19repairing, regulating and operating the toll highways 20including only the necessary expenses of the Authority, and 21(c) the principal of all bonds, interest thereon and all 22sinking fund requirements and other requirements provided by   HB5805- 2 -LRB104 22626 LNS 39074 b1resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds as they 2shall become due. In fixing the toll rates pursuant to this 3Section 19 and Section 10(c) of this Act, the Authority shall 4take into account the effect of the provisions of this Section 519 permitting the use of the toll highway system without 6payment of the covenants of the Authority contained in the 7resolutions and trust indentures authorizing the issuance of 8bonds of the Authority. No such provision permitting the use 9of the toll highway system without payment of tolls after the 10date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 11be applied in a manner that impairs the rights of bondholders 12pursuant to any resolution or trust indentures authorizing the 13issuance of bonds of the Authority. The use and disposition of 14any sinking or reserve fund shall be subject to such 15regulation as may be provided in the resolution or trust 16indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds. Subject to 17the provisions of any resolution or trust indenture 18authorizing the issuance of bonds any moneys in any such 19sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year's 20interest on the bonds then outstanding secured by such sinking 21fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All 22such bonds so redeemed or purchased shall forthwith be 23cancelled and shall not again be issued. No person shall be 24permitted to use any toll highway without paying the toll 25established under this Section except when on official Toll 26Highway Authority business which includes police and other   HB5805- 3 -LRB104 22626 LNS 39074 b1emergency vehicles. However, any law enforcement agency 2vehicle, fire department vehicle, public or private ambulance 3service vehicle engaged in the performance of an emergency 4service or duty that necessitates the use of the toll highway 5system, or other emergency vehicle that is plainly marked 6shall not be required to pay a toll to use a toll highway. A 7law enforcement, fire protection, or emergency services 8officer driving a law enforcement, fire protection, emergency 9services agency vehicle, or public or private ambulance 10service vehicle engaging in the performance of emergency 11services or duties that is not plainly marked must present an 12Official Permit Card which the law enforcement, fire 13protection, or emergency services officer receives from his or 14her law enforcement, fire protection, emergency services 15agency, or public or private ambulance service in order to use 16a toll highway without paying the toll. A law enforcement, 17fire protection, emergency services agency, or public or 18private ambulance service engaging in the performance of 19emergency services or duties must apply to the Authority to 20receive a permit, and the Authority shall adopt rules for the 21issuance of a permit, that allows public or private ambulance 22service vehicles engaged in the performance of emergency 23services or duties that necessitate the use of the toll 24highway system and all law enforcement, fire protection, or 25emergency services agency vehicles of the law enforcement, 26fire protection, or emergency services agency to use any toll   HB5805- 4 -LRB104 22626 LNS 39074 b1highway without paying the toll established under this 2Section. The Authority shall maintain in its office a list of 3all persons that are authorized to use any toll highway 4without charge when on official business of the Authority and 5such list shall be open to the public for inspection. In 6recognition of the unique role of public transportation in 7providing effective transportation in the Authority's service 8region, and to give effect to the exemption set forth in 9subsection (b) of Section 2.06 of the Northern Illinois 10Transit Authority Act, the following vehicles may use any toll 11highway without paying the toll: (1) a vehicle owned or 12operated by the Suburban Bus Division of the Northern Illinois 13Transit Authority that is being used to transport passengers 14for hire; and (2) any revenue vehicle that is owned or operated 15by a Mass Transit District created under Section 3 of the Local 16Mass Transit District Act and running regular scheduled 17service. 18    The Authority shall prominently display the toll rates 19established under this Section in a manner visible to 20approaching motorists at all toll locations. 21    Among other matters, this amendatory Act of 1990 is 22intended to clarify and confirm the prior intent of the 23General Assembly to allow toll revenues from the toll highway 24system to be used to pay a portion of the cost of the 25construction of the North-South Toll Highway authorized by 26Senate Joint Resolution 122 of the 83rd General Assembly in   HB5805- 5 -LRB104 22626 LNS 39074 b11984.2(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.